Utah statutes.
53A-1-202.   Compensation for services -- Additional per diem -- Insurance
-- Certified statements of expenses.
(1)  Each member of the State Board of Education shall receive $3,000 per
year, payable monthly, as compensation for services.
(2)  A board member may participate in any group insurance plan provided to
employees of the State Office of Education as part of their compensation on
the same basis as required for employee participation.
(3)  In addition to the provisions of Subsections (1) and (2), a board member
may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:
(a)  Section 63A-3-106;
(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and
(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
